Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1055.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3.3(a)(4) of the act of September 27, 1961 (P.L.1700, No.699), known as the Pharmacy Act, is amended to read:Section 3.3. Pharmacy Technician and Pharmacy Technician Trainee Registration, Qualifications and Supervision.--(a) A pharmacy technician shall register with the board biennially on a form prescribed by the board and pay a registration fee established by the board by regulation. An individual must 123456789101112131415161718192021 possess an unrestricted registration from the board to practice as a pharmacy technician. The following shall apply:* * *(4) An individual practicing as a pharmacy technician for at least one year [of] between January 29, 2019, and June 28, 2025, within the two-year period immediately preceding the [effective date of this section] promulgation of final-form regulations by the board implementing this section shall not be required to comply with clause (3)(i) or (ii), provided the individual applies within one year of the promulgation of regulations by the board implementing this section.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 3.5. Administration of Injectable Medications, Biologicals and Immunizations.--(a) The board shall by regulation establish education and training standards and practice guidelines pursuant to which pharmacists shall be authorized to administer injectable medications, biologicals and immunizations to individuals eight years of age or older and influenza and COVID-19 immunizations by injectable or needle-free delivery methods to individuals five years of age or older. The standards and guidelines shall include the following:(1) Satisfactory completion of an academic and practical curriculum approved by the board that includes the current guidelines and recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention in the Public Health Service of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the American Council on Pharmaceutical Education or a similar health authority or professional body and includes disease epidemiology, vaccine characteristics, injection technique, 20250SB1055PN1247 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 emergency response to adverse events and related topics.(2) Maintenance of a current cardiopulmonary resuscitation certificate acceptable to the board.(3) That the administration of injectable medications, biologicals and immunizations be in accordance with a definitive set of treatment guidelines established by a physician and consistent with one of the following:(i) The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention's Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices recommendations or another competent authority approved by the board.(ii) A determination by the Department of Health that both of the following apply:(A) Immunization of a population or subpopulation is supported by medical evidence.(B) Immunization of the population or subpopulation would advance the public health by reducing the spread or severity of infectious disease in this Commonwealth.(4) The Department of Health may exclude an immunization from a determination under clause (3)(ii) upon finding that all of the following apply:(i) Administration is no longer supported by medical evidence for a population or subpopulation.(ii) Administration is no longer effective to reduce the spread or severity of infectious diseases in this Commonwealth and would not advance the public health.(5) In making a determination under paragraph (3) or (4), the Department of Health may consider as evidence reports issued by any of the following:(i) The American Academy of Pediatrics.(ii) The American College of Obstetricians and 20250SB1055PN1247 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Gynecologists.(iii) The American College of Physicians.(iv) The American Academy of Family Physicians.(v) The Infectious Diseases Society of America.(vi) The Society for Maternal-Fetal Medicine.(6) After making a determination under paragraph (3)(ii) or (4), the Department of Health shall provide notice of the determination and the addition or exclusion by:(i) transmitting the notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin;(ii) posting the notice on the Department of Health's publicly accessible Internet website; and(iii) electronically transmitting the notice to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Consumer Protection and Professional Licensure Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Professional Licensure Committee of the House of Representatives.(7) That a minimum of two hours of the thirty-hour requirement for continuing education for license renewal be dedicated to administering injectable medications, biologicals and immunizations.(8) For individuals under eighteen years of age, that parental consent be obtained prior to administration.(9) Maintenance of a level of professional liability insurance coverage in the minimum amount of one million dollars ($1,000,000) per occurrence or claims made. Failure to maintain insurance coverage as required shall subject the licensees to disciplinary proceedings. The board shall accept as satisfactory evidence of insurance coverage any of the following:20250SB1055PN1247 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) personally purchased liability insurance;(ii) professional liability insurance coverage provided by the individual licensee's employer; or(iii) similar insurance coverage acceptable to the board.(10) Notification of the individual's primary care provider, if known, within forty-eight hours of administration.(b) Except as provided under subsection (e), a pharmacist's authority to administer injectable medications, biologicals and immunizations shall not be delegated to any other individual. A pharmacy intern who has completed a course of education and training which meets the requirements of subsection (a)(1) and (2) and maintains liability insurance in the amounts specified under subsection (a)(9) may administer injectable medications, biologicals and immunizations, in keeping with the requirements under subsection (a)(3), to individuals who are eight years of age or older and influenza and COVID-19 immunizations by injectable or needle-free delivery methods to individuals five years of age or older only under the direct, immediate and personal supervision of a pharmacist holding the authority to administer injectable medications, biologicals and immunizations or a physician, physician assistant or certified registered nurse practitioner.(c) A supervising pharmacist shall report the administration of immunizations under this section to the immunization registry maintained by the Department of Health within seventy-two hours of immunization administration and to the individual's primary care provider in accordance with subsection (a)(10). Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit a supervising pharmacist from delegating the reporting of immunization administration to a pharmacy intern or technician.20250SB1055PN1247 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) A pharmacist, pharmacy intern or pharmacist technician who administers an influenza or COVID-19 immunization to an individual under eighteen years of age shall inform the parent or adult caregiver of the importance of a well-child visit with a pediatrician or other licensed primary care provider and refer the patient as appropriate.(e) A pharmacist who holds the authority to administer injectable medications, biologicals and immunizations may delegate the authority to administer:(1) Influenza and COVID-19 immunizations to a certified registered nurse practitioner, physician assistant, registered nurse or licensed practical nurse; or(2) COVID-19 immunizations authorized or licensed by the United States Food and Drug Administration or based on a determination by the Department of Health under subsection (a)(3)(ii), and influenza immunizations recommended by the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices or based on a determination by the Department of Health under subsection (a)(3)(ii), for administration to individuals thirteen years of age or older by a pharmacy technician if: (i) The pharmacy technician:(A) Until the board promulgates final regulations implementing registration of pharmacy technicians, holds a national certification from the Pharmacy Technician Certification Board or the National Healthcareer Association; or(B) After the board promulgates final regulations implementing registration of pharmacy technicians, is registered with the board.(ii) The following conditions are met:(A) The supervising qualified pharmacist is providing 20250SB1055PN1247 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 direct, immediate and personal supervision to the qualified pharmacy technician who is administering the immunizations or vaccinations.(B) The qualified pharmacy technician has completed a practical training program that is approved by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education and that includes hands-on injection technique and the recognition and treatment of emergency reactions to vaccines.(C) The qualified pharmacy technician has a current certificate in basic cardiopulmonary resuscitation.(D) The qualified pharmacy technician has obtained liability insurance as required under subsection (a)(9) through the qualified pharmacy technician's employer.(E) Administration of a COVID-19 immunization or influenza vaccinations shall be in keeping with the requirements under subsection (a)(3).Section 3.6. Clinical Laboratory Certificate.--(a) If a pharmacy holds a valid certificate of waiver issued by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, a pharmacy or pharmacist may order and perform laboratory examinations and procedures for COVID-19, influenza, respiratory syncytial virus and streptococcal infections authorized or approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration under the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988 (Public Law 100-578, 102 Stat. 2903) and shall be exempt from the requirements under section 3 of the act of September 26, 1951 (P.L.1539, No.389), known as The Clinical Laboratory Act.(b) A pharmacist may designate the administration of a test under subsection (a) to a pharmacy intern or pharmacy technician if the designation by the pharmacist to a pharm acy intern or 20250SB1055PN1247 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 pharmacy technician and the administration of the test is in keeping with nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines that have not been disapproved by the Department of Health. The Department of Health shall submit any nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines the Department of Health has disapproved to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 3.7. Report on Pharmacy-administered Vaccines.--(a) The Department of Health shall, in consultation with the board, report to the President pro tempore of the Senate, the Majority Leader and the Minority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Majority Leader and the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives information concerning pharmacist activities authorized under this act, including:(1) The number of injectable medications, biologicals and immunizations administered to individuals under eighteen years of age broken down by age.(2) The number of injectable medications, biologicals and immunizations administered to individuals under eighteen years of age broken down by type of injectable medications, biologicals and immunizations.(3) Subject to information being made available, an assessment on whether there is a change in the number of well visits for children with their primary pediatric care provider attributable pharmacist services authorized under this act.(4) Beginning from the effective date of this section, changes in the pharmacy immunization rates for individuals under eighteen years of age.(b) The Department of Health shall review data available for 20250SB1055PN1247 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 injectable medications, biologicals and immunizations administered by a pharmacist, pharmacy intern or technician in this Commonwealth. The Department of Health shall also review data available from other state governments which have authorized pharmacists to provide similar pharmacy services as authorized under this act.(c) The Department of Health shall report its findings no later than five years following the effective date of this subsection and include recommendations for changes in the laws of this Commonwealth.(d) Upon completion of the report and transmission of the report under subsection (a), the Department of Health shall publish the findings on the Department of Health's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 3. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the addition of sections 3.5, 3.6 and 3.7 of the act.(2) Chapter 10 of the act of November 21, 2016 (P.L.1318, No.169), known as the Pharmacy Audit Integrity and Transparency Act, is repealed.Section 4. The addition of sections 3.5, 3.6 and 3.7 of the act is a continuation of sections 1002, 1003 and 1004 of the act of November 21, 2016 (P.L.1318, No.169), known as the Pharmacy Audit Integrity and Transparency Act. Except as otherwise provided in sections 3.5, 3.6 and 3.7 of the act, all activities initiated under sections 1002, 1003 and 1004 of the Pharmacy Audit Integrity and Transparency Act shall continue and remain in full force and effect and may be completed under sections 3.5, 3.6 and 3.7 of the act. Orders, regulations, rules and 20250SB1055PN1247 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 decisions which were made under sections 1002, 1003 and 1004 of the Pharmacy Audit Integrity and Transparency Act and which are in effect on the effective date of section 3(2) of this act shall remain in full force and effect until revoked, vacated or modified under sections 3.5, 3.6 and 3.7 of the act. Contracts, obligations and collective bargaining agreements entered into under sections 1002, 1003 and 1004 of the Pharmacy Audit Integrity and Transparency Act are not affected nor impaired by the repeal of sections 1002, 1003 and 1004 of the Pharmacy Audit Integrity and Transparency Act.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1055PN1247 - 10 - 1234567891011